Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-808
Reporter; duties.

The commission may also appoint a reporter to report and transcribe in duplicate all testimony given in hearings and trials before the commission and file such testimony with the commission. The commission shall certify and transmit one copy to the Clerk of the Supreme Court in all cases in which there is an appeal under section 48-812.

Laws 1947, c. 178, § 8, p. 589;

Laws 1974, LB 819, § 6;

Laws 1986, LB 809, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 115;

Laws 1992, LB 360, § 27.